Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.217

Gambling records—Penalty—Exceptions.

Whoever knowingly prints, makes, possesses, stores, or transports any gambling record, or buys, sells, offers, or solicits any interest therein, whether through an agent or employee or otherwise, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. However, this section does not apply to records relating to and kept for activities authorized by this chapter when the records are of the type and kind traditionally and usually employed in connection with the particular activity. This section also does not apply to any act or acts in furtherance of the activities when conducted in compliance with this chapter and in accordance with the rules adopted under this chapter. In the enforcement of this section direct possession of any such a gambling record is presumed to be knowing possession thereof.

[ 1994 c 218 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 218: See note following RCW 9.46.010.